Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.256

[Art. 26] Military judge of a general or special court-martial.

(1) A military judge shall be detailed to each general court-martial. Subject to regulations of the governor, a military judge may be detailed to any special court-martial. The governor shall prescribe regulations providing for the manner in which military judges are detailed for such courts-martial and for the persons who are authorized to detail military judges for such courts-martial. The military judge shall preside over each open session of the court-martial to which he or she has been detailed.

(2) A military judge shall be a commissioned officer of the armed forces who is a member of the bar of a federal court or a member of the bar of the highest court of a state and who is certified to be qualified for duty as a military judge by the state judge advocate.

(3) The military judge of a general court-martial shall be designated by the state judge advocate or a designee for detail in accordance with regulations prescribed under subsection (1) of this section. Unless the court-martial was convened by the governor, neither the convening authority nor any member of the staff shall prepare or review any report concerning the effectiveness, fitness, or efficiency of the military judge so detailed, which relates to performance of duty as a military judge. A commissioned officer who is certified to be qualified for duty as a military judge of a general court-martial may perform such duties only when he or she is assigned and directly responsible to the state judge advocate or designee, and may perform duties of a judicial or nonjudicial nature other than those relating to the primary duty as a military judge of a general court-martial when such duties are assigned by or with the approval of the state judge advocate or designee.

(4) No person is eligible to act as military judge in a case if the person is the accuser or a witness for the prosecution or has acted as investigating officer or a counsel in the same case.

(5) The military judge of a court-martial may not consult with the members of the court except in the presence of the accused, trial counsel, and defense counsel, nor may the military judge vote with the members of the court.

[ 1989 c 48 s 26; 1963 c 220 s 28.]